Utah statutes.
58-17b-623.   Disposal of unused prescription drugs.

(1)  A pharmacy may accept unused prescription drugs for disposal in accordance with administrative rules adopted by the division.

(2)  The division shall adopt administrative rules regarding a pharmacy accepting unused prescription drugs for disposal as permitted by federal law and regulation relating to the disposal of unused prescription drugs.

